Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Jury Trials

§ 1941.
Jury challenges; peremptory and for cause.

Upon the trial of a cause in any court, each party, including the State, may peremptorily challenge six jurors and any further number for cause.

§ 1942.
Repealed.
1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 1943.
Confinement and care of jury.

When the court has committed a cause to its consideration, the jury shall be confined until it agrees on a verdict or is discharged.
While so confined, the jury shall be under the care of an officer appointed by the court and sworn for that purpose.

§ 1944.
Appointment of jury foreman.

In the trial of a cause in the Superior Court by jury, the court shall appoint one of the jurors foreman at the time such cause is submitted.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 1945.
Return of jury for further consideration.

If the judges of the Superior Court before whom a cause is tried consider that the jury has mistaken the law or evidence material to the issue or has not paid proper attention thereto, they may cause it to return to a second and third consideration of the cause.
If the jury does not alter or retract its verdict, the same shall be received.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 1946.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1947.
Treating jurors; new trial.

A verdict shall be set aside and a new trial granted on proof that a party in whose favor such verdict is rendered and during the same term of court, gives to a juror, knowing him or her to be a juror in the cause, victuals or drink or procures it to be done by way of treat either before or after such verdict.

§ 1948.
View of premises by jury.

When on the trial of a cause in the Superior Court for damages to real estate, or in an action in which the title to land is concerned, it is necessary that a view be had of the premises, on motion of either party, the court may grant such view at the expense of the party making the motion.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 1949.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.